Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-906
Mental health professional, defined.

Mental health professional means a person licensed to practice medicine and surgery or psychology in this state under the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact or the Uniform Credentialing Act or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act who has proof of current certification in a psychiatric or mental health specialty.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 10, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 159;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1010;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 26;

Laws 2005, LB 534, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1185;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 59.
July 19, 2018
Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.

Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact, see section 38-3901.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.

The opinion of a general practitioner of medicine as to mental conditions is admissible in commitment proceedings, provided a proper foundation is laid. Lux v. Mental Health Board of Polk County, 202 Neb. 106, 274 N.W.2d 141 (1979).